Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-469
Permitholder; report required; contents.

A holder of an aquaculture permit shall report to the commission by January 15 for the preceding calendar year on forms provided by the commission. The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations specifying the requirements for the reports, including, but not limited to, the total number and species of organisms sold or transported during the preceding calendar year.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 7, p. 440;

C.S.1929, § 37-707;

R.S.1943, § 37-707;

Laws 1961, c. 174, § 4, p. 518;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 18;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-707;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 179;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 52.